New York, session 2025-2026, S149.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 1100-b to read as follows: 3 § 1100-b. 1,4-Dioxane. 1. The commissioner shall establish a maximum 4 contaminant level of 0.35 parts per billion for the presence of 5 1,4-Dioxane in public supplies of potable water. 6 2. Such standard for 1,4-Dioxane shall be implemented in accordance 7 with department regulations and the state administrative procedure act 8 and be completed as soon as practicable, including implementation by 9 emergency rule if determined by the commissioner as necessary to protect 10 public health. 11 § 2. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a new 12 section 17-0307 to read as follows: 13 § 17-0307. 1,4-Dioxane. 14 1. The department, in consultation with the department of health, 15 shall establish a maximum contaminant level of 0.35 parts per billion 16 for the presence of 1,4-Dioxane in ground water and runoff water from a 17 wastewater treatment plant or water supply treatment plant. 18 2. Such standard for 1,4-Dioxane shall be implemented in accordance 19 with department regulations and the state administrative procedure act 20 and be completed as soon as practicable, including implementation by 21 emergency rule if determined by the commissioner as necessary to protect 22 public health. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00625-01-5